Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.050

Distribution of property held jointly with slayer or abuser.

(1) One-half of any property held by the slayer or abuser and the decedent as joint tenants, joint owners or joint obligees shall pass upon the death of the decedent to his or her estate, and the other half shall pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer or abuser, unless the slayer or abuser obtains a separation or severance of the property or a decree granting partition.

(2) As to property held jointly by three or more persons, including the slayer or abuser and the decedent, any enrichment which would have accrued to the slayer or abuser as a result of the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent. If the slayer or abuser becomes the final survivor, one-half of the property shall immediately pass to the estate of the decedent and the other half shall pass to his or her estate upon the death of the slayer or abuser, unless the slayer or abuser obtains a separation or severance of the property or a decree granting partition.

(3) The provisions of this section shall not affect any enforceable agreement between the parties or any trust arising because a greater proportion of the property has been contributed by one party than by the other.

[ 2009 c 525 s 6; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.050. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 5.]